Louisiana, session 2026, HB1026.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1730.23(K)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1730.23. Enforcement of building codes by municipalities and parishes
* * *
K. Any municipality or parish which issues a permit for construction
pursuant to this Part shall do all of the following:
* * *
(3) Verify the contractor's license number and furnish the Louisiana State
Licensing Board for Contractors with a copy of the permit and the contractor's name
and license number.